Hawaii statutes.
[§431P-2] Establishment of Hawaii
hurricane relief fund. There shall be a Hawaii hurricane relief fund to be
placed within the department of commerce and consumer affairs for
administrative purposes. The fund shall be a public body and a body corporate
and politic. [L 1993, c 339, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next